Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
VISUAL RECORDING OF AGGRAVATED ANIMAL ABUSE
SECTION 1.  ORS 167.310 is amended to read:
167.310. As used in ORS 167.310 to 167.351:
(1) “Adequate bedding” means  bedding of sufficient quantity and quality to permit a domestic
animal to remain dry and reasonably clean and maintain a normal body temperature.
(2)(a) “Adequate shelter” includes a barn, doghouse or other enclosed structure sufficient to
protect a domestic animal from wind, rain, snow or sun,  that has adequate bedding to protect
against cold and dampness and that is maintained to protect the domestic  animal from weather and
physical  injury.
(b) “Adequate shelter” does not include:
(A) Crawl spaces under buildings or parts of buildings, such as steps, decks or stoops;
(B) The space under a vehicle;
(C) The inside of a vehicle if  the domestic animal is kept in the vehicle in a manner or for a
length of time that is likely to be detrimental to the domestic animal’s health or safety;
(D) Shelters made from cardboard or other materials that are easily degraded by the elements;
(E) Animal carriers or crates that are designed to provide temporary housing;
(F) Shelters with wire or chain-link floors, unless the domestic animal is a bird; or
(G) Shelters surrounded by waste, debris,  obstructions or impediments that could adversely af-
fect an animal’s health.
(3) “Animal” means any nonhuman mammal, bird, reptile, amphibian or fish.
(4) “Domestic animal”  means an animal, other than livestock or equines, that is owned or pos-
sessed by a person.
(5) “Equine” means a horse, pony, donkey, mule, hinny, zebra or  a hybrid of any of these ani-
mals.
(6) “Good animal husbandry” includes, but is not limited to, the dehorning of cattle, the  docking
of horses, sheep or swine, and the castration or neutering of livestock,  according to accepted prac-
tices of veterinary medicine or animal husbandry.
Enrolled House Bill 4145 (HB 4145-B) Page 1
(7) “Law enforcement animal” means a dog or horse used in law enforcement  work under the
control of a corrections officer, parole and probation officer, police officer  or youth correction offi-
cer, as those terms are defined in ORS 181A.355, who has successfully  completed at least 360 hours
of training in the care and use of a law enforcement animal, or who  has passed the demonstration
of minimum standards established by the Oregon Police Canine  Association or other accredited and
recognized animal handling organization.
(8)(a) “Livestock,” except as provided in paragraph (b)  of this subsection, has the meaning pro-
vided in ORS 609.125.
(b) “Livestock” does not include psittacines.
(9) “Maliciously” means intentionally acting  with a depravity of mind and reckless and
wanton disregard of life.
[(9)] (10) “Minimum care” means care sufficient to preserve the health and well-being of an an-
imal and, except for  emergencies or circumstances beyond the reasonable control of the owner, in-
cludes, but is not limited to, the following requirements:
(a) Food of sufficient quantity and quality  to allow for normal growth or maintenance of body
weight.
(b) Open or adequate access to potable water in sufficient quantity  to satisfy the animal’s needs.
Access to snow or ice is not adequate access to potable water.
(c) For a domestic animal other than a dog engaged in herding  or protecting livestock, access
to adequate shelter.
(d) Veterinary care deemed necessary by a reasonably prudent person  to relieve distress from
injury, neglect or disease.
(e) For a domestic animal, continuous access to an area:
(A) With adequate space for exercise necessary for the health of the animal;
(B) With air temperature suitable for the animal; and
(C) Kept reasonably clean and free from excess  waste or other contaminants that could affect
the animal’s health.
(f) For a livestock animal that cannot walk or stand without assistance:
(A) Humane euthanasia; or
(B) The provision of immediate and ongoing care to restore the animal to an ambulatory state.
[(10)] (11)  “Physical injury” means physical  trauma, impairment of physical condition or sub-
stantial pain.
[(11)] (12) “Physical trauma” means fractures, cuts, punctures, bruises, burns or other wounds.
[(12)] (13) “Possess” has the meaning provided in ORS 161.015.
[(13)] (14)  “Serious physical injury” means physical injury  that creates a substantial risk of
death or that causes protracted disfigurement,  protracted impairment of health or protracted loss
or impairment of the function of a limb or bodily organ.
[(14)(a)] (15)(a) “Tethering” means to restrain a domestic animal by tying  the domestic animal
to any object or structure by any means.
(b) “Tethering” does not include using a handheld leash for the purpose of  walking a domestic
animal.
(16) “Torture” means an action taken for the primary purpose of inflicting pain.
(17) “Visual recording” includes, but is  not limited to, photographs, films, videotapes and
computer and other digital pictures, regardless of the manner  in which the recording is
stored.
SECTION 1a.
If House Bill 4043 becomes law,  section 1 of this 2024 Act (amending ORS
167.310) is repealed and ORS 167.310 is amended to read:
167.310. As used in ORS 167.310 to 167.351:
(1) “Adequate bedding” means bedding of sufficient quantity and quality to  permit a domestic
animal to remain dry and reasonably clean and maintain a normal body temperature.
(2)(a) “Adequate shelter” includes a barn, doghouse or other enclosed structure sufficient to
protect a domestic animal from wind, rain,  snow or sun, that has adequate bedding to protect
Enrolled House Bill 4145 (HB 4145-B) Page 2
against cold and dampness and that is maintained to protect the domestic  animal from weather and
physical  injury.
(b) “Adequate shelter” does not include:
(A) Crawl spaces under buildings or parts of buildings, such as steps, decks or stoops;
(B) The space under a vehicle;
(C) The inside of a vehicle if the domestic animal is kept in the vehicle  in a manner or for a
length of time that is likely to be detrimental to the domestic animal’s health or safety;
(D) Shelters made from cardboard or other materials that are easily degraded by the elements;
(E) Animal carriers or crates that are designed to provide temporary housing;
(F) Shelters with wire or chain-link floors, unless the domestic animal is a bird; or
(G) Shelters surrounded by waste, debris, obstructions or  impediments that could adversely af-
fect an animal’s health.
(3) “Animal” means any nonhuman mammal, bird, reptile, amphibian or fish.
(4) “Domestic animal” means an animal, other than livestock or equines, that is owned  or pos-
sessed by a person.
(5) “Equine” means a horse, pony, donkey, mule,  hinny, zebra or a hybrid of any of these ani-
mals.
(6) “Good animal husbandry” includes, but is not limited to, the dehorning of cattle, the  docking
of horses, sheep or swine,  and the castration or neutering of livestock, according to accepted prac-
tices of veterinary medicine or animal husbandry.
(7) “Law enforcement animal”  means a dog or horse used in law enforcement work under the
control of a corrections officer,  parole and probation officer, police officer or youth correction offi-
cer, as those terms are defined in ORS 181A.355, who has successfully  completed at least 360 hours
of training in the care  and use of a law enforcement animal, or who has passed the demonstration
of minimum standards established by the Oregon Police Canine  Association or other accredited and
recognized animal handling organization.
(8)(a) “Livestock,” except as provided in paragraph (b)  of this subsection, has the meaning pro-
vided in ORS 609.125.
(b) “Livestock” does not include psittacines.
(9) “Minimum care” means care sufficient to  preserve the health and well-being of an animal
and, except for emergencies or circumstances beyond the reasonable  control of the owner, includes,
but is not limited to, the following requirements:
(a) Food of sufficient quantity and quality  to allow for normal growth or maintenance of body
weight.
(b) Open or adequate access to potable water in sufficient quantity  to satisfy the animal’s needs.
Access to snow or ice is not adequate access to potable water.
(c) For a domestic animal other than a dog engaged in herding  or protecting livestock, access
to adequate shelter.
(d) Veterinary care deemed necessary by a reasonably prudent person  to relieve distress from
injury, neglect or disease.
(e) For a domestic animal, continuous access to an area:
(A) With adequate space for exercise necessary for the health of the animal;
(B) With air temperature suitable for the animal; and
(C) Kept reasonably clean and free from excess  waste or other contaminants that could affect
the animal’s health.
(f) For a livestock animal that cannot walk or stand without assistance:
(A) Humane euthanasia; or
(B) The provision of immediate and ongoing care to restore the animal to an ambulatory state.
(10) “Physical injury” means physical trauma, impairment  of physical condition or substantial
pain.
(11) “Physical trauma” means fractures, cuts, punctures, bruises, burns or other wounds.
(12) “Possess” has the meaning provided in ORS 161.015.
Enrolled House Bill 4145 (HB 4145-B) Page 3
(13) “Serious physical injury” means  physical injury that creates a substantial risk of death or
that causes protracted disfigurement, protracted impairment of health or  protracted loss or impair-
ment of the function of a limb or bodily organ.
(14)(a) “Tethering” means to restrain a domestic animal by tying the domestic animal  to any
object or structure by any means.
(b) “Tethering” does not  include using a handheld leash for the purpose of walking a domestic
animal.
(15) “Visual recording” includes, but is  not limited to, photographs, films, videotapes and
computer and other digital pictures, regardless  of the manner in which the recording is
stored.
SECTION 2.  ORS 167.322 is amended to read:
167.322. (1) A person commits the crime of aggravated animal abuse in the first degree  if the
person:
(a) Maliciously kills an animal; [ or]
(b) Intentionally or knowingly tortures an animal[ .]; or
(c) Intentionally or knowingly creates a visual recording of an act  described in paragraph
(a) or (b) of this subsection.
(2) Aggravated animal abuse in the first degree is  a Class C felony and the Oregon Criminal
Justice Commission shall classify the offense as crime category 6 of the sentencing guidelines grid.
[(3) As used in this section: ]
[(a) “Maliciously” means intentionally acting with a depravity of mind and  reckless and wanton
disregard of life. ]
[(b) “Torture” means an action taken for the primary purpose of inflicting pain. ]
SECTION 2a. If House Bill 4043 becomes law,  section 2 of this 2024 Act (amending ORS
167.322) is repealed and ORS 167.322, as amended by section 4, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2024
(Enrolled House Bill 4043), is amended to read:
167.322. (1) A person commits the crime of aggravated animal abuse  in the first degree if, except
as otherwise authorized by law, the person intentionally or knowingly:
(a) Tortures an animal; [ or]
(b) Causes serious physical injury or death to an animal[ .]; or
(c) Creates a  visual recording of an act described in paragraph (a) or (b) of this sub-
section.
(2) Any practice of good animal husbandry is not a violation of this section.
(3) Aggravated animal abuse in the first degree is  a Class C felony and the Oregon Criminal
Justice Commission shall classify the offense as crime category 6 of the sentencing guidelines grid.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, the Oregon  Criminal Justice Commission shall
classify the offense of aggravated animal abuse in the first degree as  crime category 7 of the sen-
tencing guidelines grid if:
(a) The person committing the animal abuse has previously been  convicted of one or more of the
following offenses:
(A) Any offense under ORS  163.160, 163.165, 163.175, 163.185 or 163.187 or the equivalent laws
of another jurisdiction, if  the offense involved domestic violence as defined in ORS 135.230 or the
offense was committed against a minor child; or
(B) Any offense under this section or ORS 167.320, or the equivalent  laws of another jurisdic-
tion; or
(b) The person  knowingly commits the animal abuse in the immediate presence of a minor child.
For purposes of this paragraph, a minor child is  in the immediate presence of animal abuse if the
abuse is seen or directly perceived in any other manner by the minor child.
(5) As used in this section, “torture” means an  action taken for the primary purpose of inflicting
pain.
SECTION 3.
Sections 4 and 5 of this 2024 Act are added to and made a part of ORS 167.315
to 167.333.
Enrolled House Bill 4145 (HB 4145-B) Page 4
SECTION 4. (1) A person commits the  crime of encouraging aggravated animal abuse in
the first degree if the person:
(a)(A) Knowingly develops, duplicates, publishes,  prints, disseminates, exchanges, dis-
plays, finances, attempts to finance  or sells a visual recording of an act described in ORS
167.322 (1)(a) or (b), or knowingly possesses, accesses or views such a visual recording with
the intent to develop, duplicate, publish, print, disseminate, exchange, display or sell it; or
(B) Knowingly brings into this state, or causes to be brought or sent into  this state, for
sale or distribution, a visual recording of an act described in ORS 167.322 (1)(a) or (b); and
(b) Knows or is aware of and consciously disregards the fact that creation of the  visual
recording of an act described in ORS 167.322 (1)(a) or (b) involved aggravated animal abuse.
(2) Encouraging aggravated animal abuse in the first degree is a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 5.
(1) A person commits the crime  of encouraging aggravated animal abuse in
the second degree if the person:
(a)(A)(i) Knowingly possesses or controls, or knowingly accesses with the  intent to view,
a visual recording of an act described in ORS 167.322 (1)(a) or (b); or
(ii) Knowingly pays, exchanges or gives anything of  value to obtain or view a visual re-
cording of an act described in ORS 167.322 (1)(a) or (b); and
(B) Knows or is aware of and consciously  disregards the fact that creation of the visual
recording of an act described in ORS 167.322 (1)(a) or (b) involved aggravated animal  abuse;
or
(b)(A) Knowingly pays, exchanges or gives anything of value to  observe an act described
in ORS 167.322 (1)(a) or (b) or knowingly observes  an act described in ORS 167.322 (1)(a) or
(b); and
(B) Knows or is  aware of a substantial and unjustifiable risk that an act described in ORS
167.322 (1)(a) or (b) constitutes aggravated animal abuse.
(2) Encouraging aggravated animal abuse in the second degree is  a Class B misdemeanor.
SECTION 6.  ORS 167.335 is amended to read:
167.335. (1) [Except as provided in subsection (2) of this  section, ] Unless gross negligence can be
shown, the provisions of ORS 167.315 to  167.333, other than the provisions of ORS 167.332,  do
not apply to:
(a) The treatment of livestock being transported by owner or common carrier;
(b) Animals involved in rodeos or similar exhibitions;
(c) Commercially grown poultry;
(d) Animals subject to good animal husbandry practices;
(e) The killing of livestock according to the provisions of ORS 603.065;
(f) Animals subject to good veterinary practices as described in ORS 686.030;
(g) Lawful fishing, hunting and trapping activities;
(h) Wildlife management practices under color of law;
(i) Lawful scientific or agricultural research or teaching that involves the use of animals;
(j) Reasonable activities undertaken in connection with the control of vermin or pests; and
(k) Reasonable handling and training techniques.
[(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not create an exemption from ORS 167.332. ]
(2) The provisions of sections 4 and 5 of this 2024 Act do not apply to any exemption listed
in subsection (1) of this section or to:
(a) Any activity undertaken in the course of bona fide law enforcement activity;
(b) Any activity necessary to the proper functioning of the criminal justice system;
(c) The disclosure of a visual recording of an act described in ORS 167.322 (1)(a) or (b):
(A) In the course of reporting conduct to a law enforcement agency; or
(B) If the disclosure serves a lawful public interest;
(d) Obtaining, viewing or possessing a visual recording of an act described in ORS 167.322
(1)(a) or (b) as part of a bona fide treatment program for sexual offenders; or
Enrolled House Bill 4145 (HB 4145-B) Page 5
(e) A public library, as defined in ORS 357.400, or a library  exempt from taxation under
ORS 307.090 or 307.130.
RELATED AMENDMENTS TO ANIMAL POSSESSION PROHIBITION
SECTION 7.  ORS 167.332 is amended to read:
167.332. (1) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section:
(a) In addition to any other penalty imposed by law, a person convicted of violating ORS 167.315,
167.340 or 167.355  or section 4 or 5  of this 2024 Act  or of a misdemeanor under ORS 167.320,
167.325 or 167.330 may not possess any animal of the same  genus against which the crime was
committed, or which the crime involved,  or any domestic animal for a period of five  years fol-
lowing entry of the conviction.
(b) In addition to any other penalty imposed by law, a person convicted of violating ORS 167.322,
167.333, 167.365 or 167.428 or of a felony under ORS 167.320, 167.325 or 167.330 may not possess  any
animal of the same genus against which the crime was committed , or which the crime involved,
or any domestic animal for a  period of 15 years following entry of the conviction. However, the
sentencing court may reduce the prohibition period if the person successfully  completes mental
health treatment approved by the court.
(2) A  person who possesses an animal in violation of this section commits a Class C
misdemeanor. When a person is convicted  of possessing an animal in violation of this section, as
part of the sentence the court may order the removal  of that animal from the person’s residence and
as a condition of  the person’s probation may prohibit the person from possessing any animal of the
same genus :
(a) That the person unlawfully possessed under this section [ or];
(b) Against which the underlying violation  of ORS 167.315, 167.320, 167.322, 167.325, 167.330,
167.333, 167.340, 167.355, 167.365 or 167.428 was committed ; or
(c) Which the underlying violation of section 4 or 5 of this 2024 Act involved .
(3) The animal possession prohibition described in subsection (1) of this section does  not apply
to a person’s first  conviction if the person is the owner of a commercial livestock operation and the
underlying violation of ORS 167.315, 167.320, 167.322, 167.325, 167.330, 167.333, 167.340, 167.355,
167.365 or 167.428 or  section 4 or 5 of this 2024 Act  was committed against or involved livestock.
(4)(a) A person subject to an animal possession  prohibition described in subsection (1) of this
section may file a motion with  the sentencing court requesting a waiver of the prohibition. The
person must file a sworn affidavit in support of the motion stating that:
(A) The person’s conviction leading to the possession prohibition involved only livestock;
(B) During the two years before the conviction triggering the prohibition, the person was the
owner of a commercial livestock operation;
(C) The person has not been convicted, in the previous five years, of a crime  involving animals
or domestic violence or a crime where the victim was under 18 years of age; and
(D) The person’s conviction was the result of:
(i) Criminal liability for the conduct of another person under ORS 161.155 (2)(c);
(ii) Criminal liability of a corporation as described  in ORS 161.170, and the person is a corpo-
ration; or
(iii) Animal neglect as described in ORS 167.325 or 167.330 and the person’s criminal  conduct
was not knowing or intentional.
(b) When a person files a motion and affidavit described in  paragraph (a) of this subsection, the
sentencing  court  shall hold a hearing. At the hearing, the sentencing court shall grant the motion
if the person proves by clear and convincing evidence that:
(A) Continued enforcement of the prohibition  against possessing livestock would result in sub-
stantial economic hardship that cannot otherwise be mitigated;
(B) The person no longer poses any risk to animals; and
Enrolled House Bill 4145 (HB 4145-B) Page 6
(C) The person is capable of providing and willing  to provide necessary, adequate and appro-
priate levels of care for all livestock that would come within the person’s custody  or control if the
petition is granted.
(c) When deciding a  motion filed under this subsection, the sentencing court may consider the
person’s financial circumstances and mental health in determining whether the person is  capable
of adequately caring for livestock.
(d) If the sentencing court grants the motion described in  this subsection, the waiver of the
prohibition against possessing animals shall apply only to livestock. The sentencing court shall  fur-
ther order that for five years the person must consent to reasonable inspections by  law enforcement
and the United States Department of Agriculture to  ensure the welfare of the livestock under the
person’s custody or control. A refusal to consent to  a reasonable inspection described in this para-
graph is contempt of  court and, if the person is found in contempt, shall result in the sentencing
court revoking the waiver of the possession prohibition.
(e) As used in this subsection, “commercial livestock operation” means a  business engaged in
the raising, breeding or selling of livestock for profit.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 8.  ORS 105.597 is amended to read:
105.597. In addition to any places described in ORS 105.555, the following  are declared to be
nuisances and shall be enjoined and abated as provided in ORS 105.550 to 105.600:
(1) Any place being used on a continuous, regular or sporadic basis for carrying out any of  the
following activities, except with regard to activities and animals described under ORS  167.335,
whether or not carried out with a particular mental state:
(a) Causing physical injury or serious physical injury, both as defined in ORS  167.310, or cruelly
causing death.
(b) Killing maliciously as defined in ORS  [ 167.322] 167.310 or committing torture as defined in
ORS [ 167.322] 167.310.
(c) Failing to provide minimum care as defined in ORS 167.310.
(d) Possession of a domestic animal as  defined in ORS 167.310 by a person described under ORS
167.332.
(2) Any place appearing to be vacant at which a  domestic animal or equine, both as defined in
ORS 167.310, are present and have been left without provision for minimum care as defined in  ORS
167.310.
(3) Any place being used on a continuous, regular or sporadic basis for carrying out any of  the
following activities, whether or not carried out with a particular mental state:
(a) Training or keeping  an animal for use in an exhibition of fighting as defined in ORS 167.355.
(b) Preparing for, occupation for, promoting, conducting or participating in an exhibition of
fighting as defined in ORS 167.355.
(c) Possessing, keeping, breeding, training,  buying, selling or offering for sale a fighting dog as
defined in ORS 167.360.
(d) Promoting, conducting, participating in or performing services in furtherance  of a dogfight
as defined in ORS 167.360.
(e) Occupation, keeping or use of the place for a dogfight as defined in ORS 167.360.
(f) Exchanging for commerce raw  fur of a domestic cat or dog as defined in ORS 167.390, or
products that include the fur of a domestic cat or dog, if the fur is  obtained through a process that
kills or maims the domestic cat or dog.
(g) Possessing, keeping, rearing, training, buying, selling or  offering for sale a fighting bird as
defined in ORS 167.426.
(h) Promoting, conducting, participating in or performing services in  furtherance of a cockfight
as defined in ORS 167.426.
(i) Occupation, keeping or use of the place for a cockfight as defined in ORS 167.426.
Enrolled House Bill 4145 (HB 4145-B) Page 7
(4) Any place being used on a continuous, regular or sporadic basis for carrying out any of  the
following  activities:
(a) Sexual assault of an animal as described in ORS 167.333.
(b) Possession of dogfighting paraphernalia as described under ORS 167.372.
(c) Selling or offering for sale  equipment other than paraphernalia described in paragraph (b)
of this subsection with the intent that the equipment be used to train a fighting dog  as defined in
ORS 167.360.
(d) Possessing, controlling or otherwise  having charge at the same time of more than 50 sexually
intact dogs that are two or more years of age for the primary purpose of reproduction.
(e) Manufacturing, buying, selling, bartering, exchanging, possessing  or offering for sale a gaff
or slasher as those terms are defined in ORS 167.426, or other  sharp implement designed for at-
tachment to the leg of a  fighting bird as defined in ORS 167.426, with the intent that the gaff,
slasher or other sharp implement be used in a cockfight as defined in ORS 167.426.
(f) Manufacturing, buying, selling, bartering, exchanging, possessing or offering for sale equip-
ment other than equipment described in paragraph (e) of this  subsection with the intent that the
equipment be used to train or handle a fighting  bird as defined in ORS 167.426 or to enhance the
fighting ability of a fighting bird.
SECTION 8a.
If House Bill 4043 becomes law,  section 8 of this 2024 Act (amending ORS
105.597) is repealed.
APPLICABILITY
SECTION 9. Sections 4 and 5 of this 2024 Act and the amendments to  ORS 105.597,
167.310, 167.322, 167.332 and 167.335 by sections 1, 2, and 6 to 8 of this 2024 Act apply to con-
duct occurring on or after the effective date of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 9a.  If House Bill 4043 becomes law, section 9 of this 2024 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 9.  Sections 4 and 5 of this 2024 Act and the amendments to ORS [ 105.597,] 167.310, 167.322,
167.332 and 167.335 by sections [ 1] 1a, [2] 2a, [ and] 6 [ to 8 ] and 7  of this 2024 Act apply  to conduct
occurring on or after the effective date of this 2024 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 10. The unit captions  used in this 2024 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 4145 (HB 4145-B) Page 8
Passed by House February 20, 2024
Repassed by House March 6, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4145 (HB 4145-B) Page 9